Missouri, session 2026, SB1114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 376.1222, RSMo, is repealed and one
new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section
376.1222, to read as follows:
376.1222. 1. Any health insurance policy through the
Medicaid program pursuant to chapter 208, the children's
health insurance program pursuant to sections 208.631 to
208.660, and any health care plans issued to employees under
the Missouri consolidated health care plan established
pursuant to chapter 103 that are delivered, issued for
delivery, continued or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2004, shall provide coverage for prostheses and
expenses for scalp hair prostheses worn for hair loss
suffered as a result of alopecia areata or alopecia totalis
for persons eighteen years of age or younger who are covered
under a policy, program or plan pursuant to this section.
The benefits required by this subsection shall expire when
the covered person reaches eighteen years of age.
2. Any health benefit plan delivered, issued for
delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for prostheses and
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1114 2
expenses for scalp hair prostheses worn for hair loss
suffered as a result of cancer treatment.
3. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning as is
ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(2) "Prostheses", artificial appliances used to
replace lost natural structures;
[(2)] (3) "Scalp hair prostheses", artificial
substitutes for scalp hair that are made specifically for a
particular individual.
[3.] 4. The coverage required by this section shall
not be more than a maximum benefit amount of two hundred
dollars per calendar year or exceed a lifetime maximum
benefit amount of three thousand two hundred dollars for
those persons who select a more permanent scalp hair
prosthesis. A person may request a one-time expenditure of
up to three thousand two hundred dollars. The benefits
required by this section shall expire when total benefits
paid reach three thousand two hundred dollars [or when such
person listed in subsection 1 of this section reaches
eighteen years of age].
[4.] 5. The health care service required by this
section shall not be subject to any greater deductible or co-
payment than other similar health care services provided by
the policy, program, or plan.
[5.] 6. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a
health insurer or health benefit plan from providing
coverage that is greater than or more favorable to persons
than the coverage provided by this section.
✓